North Dakota, session 69, SB2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-73-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-73-14. Recording and rerecording brands - Fee.
Each application for recording or rerecording a brand must be accompanied by a fee in the amount
of twenty-fivefifty dollars.

S. B. NO. 2139 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2139.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 7 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State